Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 2. Traffic Signs, Signals, and Markings

§ 1021.
Obedience to traffic-control devices.

The driver of any vehicle shall obey the instructions of any official traffic-control device applicable to him or her placed in accordance with this chapter unless otherwise directed by an enforcement officer, subject to the exceptions granted in this chapter.

No provision of this chapter for which signs are required may be enforced if at the time and place of the alleged violation an official sign is not in approximately proper position and sufficiently legible to be seen by an ordinarily observant person. Whenever a particular section does not state that signs are required, the section is effective even though no signs are erected or in place.

Whenever official traffic-control devices are placed in positions approximately conforming to this chapter the devices are presumed to have been placed by the official act or direction of lawful authority, unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

An official traffic-control device placed pursuant to this chapter and purporting to conform to the lawful requirements pertaining to the device is presumed to comply with this chapter, unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1022.
Traffic-control signals.

Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in combination, only the colors green, red, and yellow may be used, except for special pedestrian signals carrying a word legend, and the signals shall indicate and apply to drivers and pedestrians as follows:

Green signal.

Vehicular traffic facing a circular green signal may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless a sign prohibits either turn. Vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left, shall yield the right of way to other vehicles or to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or on an adjacent crosswalk at the time the signal is exhibited.

Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow signal, shown alone or in combination with another signal, may cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by the arrow, or such other movement as is permitted by other signals shown at the same time. Vehicular traffic shall yield the right of way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk or to other traffic lawfully using the intersection.

Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal, as provided in section 1023 of this title, pedestrians facing a green signal may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk, but not when the sole green signal is a turn arrow.

Steady yellow signal.

Vehicular traffic facing a steady yellow signal is thereby warned that the related green signal is being terminated or that a red signal will be exhibited immediately thereafter, when vehicular traffic shall not enter the intersection.

Pedestrians facing a steady yellow signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in section 1023 of this title, are advised that there is insufficient time to cross the roadway before a red signal is shown, and no pedestrian shall then start to cross the roadway.

Steady red signal.

Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular red signal alone shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, shall stop before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection.

Except when a sign is in place prohibiting a turn, vehicular traffic facing any steady red signal may cautiously enter the intersection to turn right, or to turn left from a one way street into a one way street, after stopping as required by subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3). This traffic shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection. No motorist shall turn right when facing a red arrow signal indication unless a regulatory sign is present that permits this movement.

Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in section 1023 of this title, pedestrians facing a steady red signal alone shall not enter the roadway.

If an official traffic-control signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, this section is applicable except as to those provisions that by their nature can have no application. Any stop required shall be made at a sign or marking on the pavement indicating where the stop is to be made, but in the absence of any sign or marking the stop shall be made at the signal.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1975, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), eff. Feb. 25, 1976;

1977, No. 8

;

2007, No. 75

, § 28;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 174.

§ 1023.
Pedestrian-control signals.

Whenever special pedestrian-control signals exhibiting the words “Walk” or “Don’t Walk” are in place the signals indicate as follows:

“Walk”: pedestrians facing the signal may proceed across the roadway in the direction of the signal and shall be given the right of way by all drivers.

“Don’t Walk”: no pedestrian shall start to cross the roadway in the direction of the signal, but any pedestrian who has begun his or her crossing on the “Walk” signal shall proceed to a sidewalk or a safety island while the “Don’t Walk” signal is showing.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1024.
Flashing signals.

Whenever a flashing red or yellow signal is used in a traffic sign or signal it requires obedience by vehicular traffic as follows:

Flashing red: When a red lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers shall stop before entering the nearest crosswalk at an intersection or at a limit line when marked, or, if there are none, before entering the intersection, and the right to proceed is subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign.

Flashing yellow: When a yellow lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles may proceed through the intersection or past the signal only with caution.

This section does not apply to railroad grade crossings. Conduct of drivers approaching railroad grade crossings is governed by sections 1071, 1072, and 1073 of this title.

This section does not apply to operators of vehicles encountering school buses. Conduct of drivers encountering school buses is governed by section 1075 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1025.
Standards.

The U.S. Department of Transportation Federal Highway Administration’s Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) for streets and highways as amended shall be the standards for all traffic control signs, signals, and markings within the State. The latest revision of the MUTCD shall be adopted upon its effective date except in the case of projects beyond a preliminary state of design that are anticipated to be constructed within two years of the otherwise applicable effective date; such projects may be constructed according to the MUTCD standards applicable at the design stage. Existing signs, signals, and markings shall be valid until such time as they are replaced or reconstructed. When new traffic control devices are erected or placed or existing traffic control devices are replaced or repaired the equipment, design, method of installation, placement, or repair shall conform with the MUTCD.

The standards of the MUTCD shall apply for both State and local authorities as to traffic control devices under their respective jurisdiction.

Traffic and control signals at intersections with exclusive pedestrian walk cycles shall be of sufficient duration to allow a pedestrian to leave the curb and travel across the roadway before opposing vehicles receive a green light. Determination of the length of the signal shall take into account the circumstances of persons with ambulatory disabilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1975, No. 26

;

1985, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 33;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 145.

§ 1026.
Lane control signals.

When lane direction control signals are placed over the individual lanes of a street or highway, vehicular traffic shall travel in any lane over which there is a green signal, but may not enter or travel in any lane over which there is a red signal.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1027.
Unauthorized signs, signals, or markings.

No person shall place, maintain, or display upon or in view of any highway any unauthorized sign, signal, marking, or device which is an imitation of or resembles an official traffic-control device or railroad sign or signal, or which attempts to direct the movement of traffic, or which obscures or interferes with the effectiveness of an official traffic-control device or any railroad sign or signal.

No person shall place or maintain upon any highway, nor may any public authority permit upon any highway, any traffic sign or signal bearing thereon any commercial advertising, except as otherwise provided in 10 V.S.A. chapter 21.

This section shall not be deemed to prohibit the erection upon private property adjacent to highways of signs giving useful directional information and of a type that cannot be mistaken for official signs, nor shall this provision affect any right or obligation created or recognized under 10 V.S.A. chapter 21.

Every prohibited sign, signal, or marking is a public nuisance, and the Agency of Transportation may remove it or cause it to be removed without notice.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1028.
Interference with devices or signals.

No person shall, without lawful authority, alter or attempt to alter, deface, injure, knock down, or remove any official traffic-control device or any railroad sign or signal or any inscription, shield, or insignia thereon, or any part thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973.

§ 1029.
Municipal signs.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 1025 and 1027 of this title, municipalities may erect alternative signs of a guidance or informational nature and creative design, in accordance with the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 494(15)

, to assist persons in reaching destinations that are transportation centers, geographic districts, historic monuments, and significant or unique educational, recreational, or cultural landmarks.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2015, No. 47

, § 27.